California, session 20252026, AB369.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1714.27 is added to the Civil Code, to read:1714.27. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a person not otherwise licensed to administer anti-seizure rescue medication, but who administers anti-seizure rescue medication at the scene of an emergency, in good faith and not for compensation, to a person who is experiencing, or is suspected of experiencing, a seizure shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for this administration so long as the person’s conduct is not grossly negligent and does not constitute willful or wanton misconduct.(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to administration of anti-seizure rescue medication to a pupil on a school site which shall, instead, comply with Article 4.6 (commencing with Section 49468) of Chapter 9 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code.